Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.021, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Plate transfer. (a) When ownership of a vehicle described in subdivision 1deleted text begin ,deleted text end is transferred, the owner of the vehicle deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end remove the disability plate or plates. deleted text begin The buyer of the motor vehicle is entitled to receive a regular plate or plates for the vehicle without further cost for the remainder of the registration period.deleted text end (b) Notwithstanding section 168.12, subdivision 1, the disability plate or plates may be transferred to a replacement vehicle on notification to the commissioner. However, the disability plate or plates may not be transferred unless the replacement vehicle (1) is listed under section 168.012, subdivision 1, and, in case of a single plate for a motorcycle or a motorized bicycle, the replacement vehicle is a motorcycle or a motorized bicycle, and (2) is owned or primarily operated by the permanently physically disabled person. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Certificate of title. new text end new text begin "Certificate of title" means official documentation issued by the commissioner that serves as proof of ownership and provides documentary evidence of the right of ownership and any associated security interests in a vehicle. The certificate of title may be printed or issued electronically. The certificate of title does not serve as a guarantee of free and clear ownership. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Filing of application; issuance of certificate. new text begin (a) new text end The deleted text begin department shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner mustnew text end file each application receiveddeleted text begin ,deleted text end andnew text begin ,new text end when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity and that the applicant is entitled to the issuance of a certificate of title deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin , mustnew text end issue a certificate of title for the vehicle or manufactured home. new text begin (b) The commissioner must issue the certificate of title to a secured party if a secured party is named on the title application. Certificates of title issued to secured parties are subject to release terms described in section 168A.20, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Electronic transmission. new text end new text begin (a) If the commissioner accepts electronic transmission of secured party data by a financial institution, including release of liens, a deputy registrar who is equipped with electronic transmission technology and trained on its use must retain the filing fee under section 168.33, subdivision 7. The deputy registrar must review the secured interest application to determine its genuineness and regularity before issuing a certificate of title and must retain the filing fee under section 168.33, subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (2). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must establish reasonable performance, security, technical, and financial standards to approve companies that provide computer software and services to financial institutions and lenders to electronically transmit secured party data. An approved company must be offered access to department facilities, staff, and technology on a fair and reasonable basis. An approved company must not have an ownership interest with a deputy registrar, driver's license agent, or motor vehicle dealer. An approved company is not eligible to be appointed by the commissioner as a deputy registrar or driver's license agent or licensed as a motor vehicle dealer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.06, is amended to read: 168A.06 DELIVERY OF CERTIFICATE. The certificate of title must be delivered to the owner named deleted text begin in it. Secured parties, if any, must be mailed notification of their security interest fileddeleted text end new text begin on the certificate unless a secured party is named on the application, in which case the certificate of title must be delivered to the secured party named on the titlenew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.10, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Removal of license plates. new text end new text begin If an owner transfers interest in a vehicle by means other than the creation of a security interest or as defined in section 297B.01, subdivision 16, paragraph (c), clauses (1) to (5), the owner must remove the existing license plates from the vehicle, and the purchaser must, at the time of transfer, obtain new license plates for the vehicle and pay the fees specified in section 168.12, subdivision 5, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.13, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Delivery of registration card and plates. A transferor of a vehicle, other than a dealer transferring a new vehicle, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end deliver to the transferee at the time of the delivery of possession of the vehicle the registration card deleted text begin and license platesdeleted text end for the vehicle. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168A.14, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. New certificate after security interest filed. The department, upon receipt of an affidavit as provided in section 524.3-1201, paragraph (a), an application for a new certificate of title, and any required fee, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue a new certificate of title in the name of the successor as owner, listing any secured party on deleted text begin it. The department shall deliver the certificate to the successor and shall issue any secured party a notification that the security interest has been filed.deleted text end new text begin the certificate of title. The department must issue the certificate of title to the secured party. Certificates of title issued to secured parties are subject to release terms described in section 168A.20, subdivision 1.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Perfection of second or subsequent security interest. new text end new text begin (a) If a certificate of title is held by a secured party, perfection of a second or subsequent security interest may be accomplished by submitting the following to the department: new text end new text begin (1) an application for a certificate of title containing the name and address of the second or subsequent secured party and the date of the second or subsequent secured party's security agreement; and new text end new text begin (2) the required fee. new text end new text begin (b) Upon receipt of the items in paragraph (a), the department must instruct the secured party holding the existing certificate of title to deliver the existing certificate of title to the department within ten days. The validity of the security interest held by the secured party on the existing certificate of title is not affected by delivering the certificate of title to the department. new text end new text begin (c) A second or subsequent security interest is perfected upon delivery of the application and fee under paragraph (a) to the department. The department must issue a new certificate of title noting the second or subsequent security interest. The new certificate of title must be delivered to the secured party holding the highest priority perfected security interest in the vehicle. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.143, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Satisfaction of manufactured home security lien; release. new text begin (a) new text end A security interest perfected under this chapter may be canceled seven years from the perfection date for a manufactured home, upon the request of the owner of the manufactured home, if the owner has paid the lien in full or the lien has been abandoned and the owner is unable to locate the lienholder to obtain a lien release. The owner must send a letter to the lienholder by certified mail, return receipt requested, stating the reason for the release and requesting a lien release. If the owner is unable to obtain a lien release by sending a letter by certified mail, then the owner must present to the department the returned letter as evidence of the attempted contact, or the acknowledgment of receipt of the letter, together with a copy of the letter and an owner affidavit of nonresponse. new text begin (b) Upon acceptance of the evidence submitted by the owner, the commissioner must release the security interest from the certificate of title and assign the certificate of title to the next named secured party or, if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate of title. new text end new text begin (c) Upon notification that all secured parties have released their interest in the vehicle, the owner may apply for a physical copy of the certificate of title in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. Upon verification that all secured parties have been satisfied and all required taxes and fees have been paid by the owner, the department must mail a physical copy of the certificate of title to the vehicle owner or any person who delivers to the department an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate of title. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.18, is amended to read: 168A.18 DUTIES OF PARTIES RELATING TO SECURITY INTEREST. If an owner creates a security interest in a vehicle: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end The owner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately execute the application in the space provided deleted text begin therefordeleted text end on the certificate of title, or in a format the department prescribes, to name the secured party on the certificate, showing the name and address of the secured party, and cause the certificate, application, and the required fees and taxes to be delivered to the secured party. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end The secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately cause the certificate, application, and the required fees and taxes to be mailed or delivered to the department. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end A second or subordinate secured party does not affect the rights of the first secured party under a security agreement. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end Upon receipt of the certificate of title, application, and the required fees and taxes, the department deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue a new certificate containing the name and address of the new secured party, and mail or deliver the certificate to the deleted text begin ownerdeleted text end new text begin secured partynew text end . The deleted text begin secured party or parties shalldeleted text end new text begin owner mustnew text end be notified that the security interest has been recorded. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.20, is amended to read: 168A.20 SATISFACTION OF SECURITY INTEREST. Subdivision 1. Certificate with latest secured party; release. new text begin (a) new text end Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the secured party, the secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, execute a release of security interest in the space provided deleted text begin therefordeleted text end on the certificate or as the department prescribes, and deleted text begin mail ordeleted text end deliver the deleted text begin certificate anddeleted text end release to thenew text begin commissioner. The certificate of title is then assigned to thenew text end nextnew text begin namednew text end secured party deleted text begin named therein,deleted text end ornew text begin ,new text end if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. deleted text begin The owner, other than a dealer holding the vehicle for resale, shall promptly cause the certificate and release, together with the required fees and taxes, to be mailed or delivered to the department, which shall release the secured party's rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.deleted text end new text begin Upon notification that all secured parties have released interest in the vehicle, the owner may apply for a physical copy of the certificate of title in the manner prescribed by the commissioner.new text end new text begin (b) Upon verification that all secured parties have been satisfied and all required fees and taxes have been paid by the owner, the department must mail a physical copy of the certificate of title to the vehicle owner or any person who delivers to the department an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. new text end Subd. 2. Certificate with prior secured party; release. Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of a prior secured party, the secured party whose security interest is satisfied shall within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, execute a release in the format the department prescribes and deliver the release to the deleted text begin owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive itdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end . The secured party in possession of the certificate of title deleted text begin shall eitherdeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end deliver the certificate to the deleted text begin owner, or the person authorized by the owner, for delivery to thedeleted text end department, or upon receipt of the release, mail or deliver it with the certificate to the department, which deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end release the subordinate secured party's rights on the certificate deleted text begin or issue a new certificatedeleted text end . Subd. 3. Certificate with owner. new text begin (a) new text end Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the owner, the secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, execute a release of security interest in the format prescribed by the department and deleted text begin mail ordeleted text end deliver the deleted text begin notification withdeleted text end release to the deleted text begin owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the releasedeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end . The secured party may notify the deleted text begin registrardeleted text end new text begin ownernew text end of the satisfaction of lien in a manner prescribed by the department.new text begin Upon notification that all secured parties have released interest in the vehicle, the owner may apply for a physical copy of the certificate of title in the manner prescribed by the commissioner.new text end new text begin (b) Upon verification that all secured parties have been satisfied and all required fees and taxes have been paid by the owner, the department must mail a physical copy of the certificate of title to the vehicle owner or any person who delivers to the department an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. new text end Subd. 4. Satisfaction of lien for child support; release. new text begin (a) new text end If the secured party is a public authority or a child support or maintenance obligee with a lien under section 168A.05, subdivision 8, upon either the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the owner, or the execution by the owner of a written payment agreement determined to be acceptable by the court, a child support magistrate, the public authority, or the obligee, within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, the secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end execute a release of security interest in the format prescribed by the department and deleted text begin mail ordeleted text end deliver the deleted text begin notification withdeleted text end release to the deleted text begin owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the release.deleted text end new text begin commissioner. Upon notification that all secured parties have released interest in the vehicle, the owner may apply for a physical copy of the certificate of title in the manner prescribed by the commissioner.new text end new text begin (b) Upon verification that all secured parties have been satisfied and all required fees and taxes have been paid by the owner, the department must mail a physical copy of the certificate of title to the vehicle owner or any person who delivers to the department an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. new text end Subd. 5. Satisfaction of automobile lien seven years old; release. new text begin (a) new text end A security interest perfected under this chapter may be canceled seven years from the perfection date for a passenger automobile, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24, upon the request of the owner of the passenger automobile, if the owner has paid the lien in full and is unable to locate the lienholder to obtain a lien release. At a minimum, the owner must send a letter to the lienholder by certified mail, return receipt requested, requesting a lien release. If the owner is unable to obtain a lien release by sending a letter by certified mail, then the owner must present to the department or its agent the returned letter as evidence of the attempted contact. This subdivision applies only to: (1) vehicle owners who are individuals; or (2) dealers licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2 or 3, who are purchasing a vehicle from an individual owner for resale.new text begin Upon acceptance of the evidence submitted by the owner, the department must release the security interest form and the certificate of title and assign the certificate of title to the next named secured party electronically or, if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate electronically. The owner must be notified when the secured party changes or all secured parties have released their interest in the vehicle and that the commissioner must hold the title electronically for the owner.new text end new text begin (b) Upon notification that all secured parties have released interest in the vehicle, the owner may apply for a physical copy of the certificate of title in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. Upon verification that all secured parties have been satisfied and all required fees and taxes have been paid by the owner, the department must mail a physical copy of the certificate of title to the vehicle owner or any person who delivers to the department an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for titles issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168D.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority. (a) The commissioner of public safety may enter into an agreement or arrangement with the duly authorized representative of another jurisdiction or make an independent declaration granting to motor carriers of qualified motor vehicles properly registered or licensed in another member jurisdiction benefits, privileges, and exemptions from paying, wholly or partially, fuel taxes, fees, or other charges imposed for operating the vehicles under the laws of Minnesota. The agreement, arrangement, or declaration may impose terms and conditions consistent with federal and state laws and regulations. (b) The commissioner of public safety may ratify and effectuate an international fuel tax agreement or other fuel tax agreement in accordance with state and federal authorities. The commissioner's authority includesnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end collecting fuel taxes duedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) new text end issuing fuel licensesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) new text end issuing refundsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4) new text end conducting auditsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5) new text end assessing penalties and interestdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6) new text end issuing fuel trip permitsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (7) new text end issuing decalsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end deleted text begin and deleted text end new text begin (8) new text end suspending or denying licensingdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) entering into a written agreement with any taxpayer or duly authorized agent or representative of the taxpayer relating to the liability of the taxpayer with respect to any fuel tax audit assessment exceeding $750 for any tax period ending prior to the date of the agreement. new text end (c) Based on these powers, the commissioner and the state of Minnesota have entered into a formal agreement with other states of the United States, the District of Columbia, provinces and territories of Canada, and any other member jurisdiction of the International Fuel Tax Agreement (IFTA) compact as approved by Congress in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act (ISTEA), Public Law 102-240, to assess and collect fuel tax in a uniform and consistent manner across jurisdictions. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168D.15, is amended to read: 168D.15 DELINQUENT FILING OR PAYMENT. If a motor carrier licensed under this section is delinquent in eithernew text begin (1)new text end filing or paying the International Fuel Tax Agreement (IFTA) report or billing for more than 30 daysnew text begin and has not entered into an approved installment agreement with regard to an IFTA audit assessmentnew text end , ornew text begin (2)new text end paying the international registration plan billing under section 168.187 for more than 30 days, the motor carrier, after ten days' written notice, is subject to suspension of the apportioned license plates and the IFTA license. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin [171.057] ELECTRONIC CREDENTIALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. new text end new text begin (c) "Credential" means a driver's license or identification card issued by the department. Credential does not include an electronic credential. new text end new text begin (d) "Credential holder" means an individual that has been issued a credential or electronic credential. new text end new text begin (e) "Data element" means a distinct component of a credential holder's information that is found on an electronic credential. new text end new text begin (f) "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of the credential holder's credential that conveys identity and driving privilege information and is in compliance with AAMVA's Mobile Driver's License Implementation Guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard. new text end new text begin (g) "Provision" means the process by which: new text end new text begin (1) a credential holder submits a request to a wallet provider for an electronic credential; new text end new text begin (2) the wallet provider seeks validation of the credential holder's request; and new text end new text begin (3) the department validates the request and transmits secure identity and driving privilege data to the wallet provider. new text end new text begin (h) "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential holder is presenting the electronic credential. new text end new text begin (i) "Wallet provider" means a person or entity that operates or controls a digital application or service used to securely store, manage, and present an electronic credential on behalf of an individual, including performing credential authentication and security functions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin Before provisioning electronic credentials to a credential holder, the department must enter into an agreement with the wallet provider that ensures compliance with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Issuance and life cycle management. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who holds a valid, unexpired credential issued by the department may request that a wallet provider and the department provision an electronic credential. new text end new text begin (b) The department may invalidate an electronic credential when the department determines that the credential or electronic credential: new text end new text begin (1) is invalid; new text end new text begin (2) was issued improperly or in error; or new text end new text begin (3) has been used in furtherance of fraud. new text end new text begin (c) A wallet provider must cancel an electronic credential upon notification from the department under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) The department may adopt rules necessary for the management and operation of an electronic credential system. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 16A.1283, the department may impose a fee to provision an electronic credential. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Verification process. new text end new text begin (a) A relying party must authenticate an electronic credential in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards before accepting an electronic credential. new text end new text begin (b) Electronic credential data are subject to all state and federal data security and privacy protection laws and regulations. new text end new text begin (c) A relying party must only request data elements that are necessary to complete a transaction for which data are being requested. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Privacy and tracking. new text end new text begin A relying party must not retain data elements of an electronic credential without the express consent of the credential holder. A relying party must inform the credential holder of the use and retention period for any retained data. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Acceptance of electronic credentials. new text end new text begin (a) An electronic credential is not a driver's license for purposes of section 171.08. new text end new text begin (b) A relying party must not condition acceptance of an electronic credential on a credential holder relinquishing possession of an electronic device. new text end new text begin (c) Presenting an electronic credential to law enforcement does not authorize law enforcement to take possession of or search the electronic device used for presenting the electronic credential. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2028, or when the commissioner adopts rules necessary to implement this section, whichever occurs first, except that subdivision 3, paragraph (d), is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.12, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Driver and vehicle services information system; security and auditing. (a) The commissioner must establish written procedures to ensure that only individuals authorized by law may enter, update, or access not public data collected, created, or maintained by the driver and vehicle services information system. An authorized individual's ability to enter, update, or access data in the system must correspond to the official duties or training level of the individual and to the statutory authorization granting access for that purpose. All queries and responses, and all actions in which data are entered, updated, accessed, shared, or disseminated, must be recorded in a data audit trail. Data contained in the audit trail are public to the extent the data are not otherwise classified by law. (b) If the commissioner determines that an individual willfully entered, updated, accessed, shared, or disseminated data in violation of state or federal law, the commissioner must impose disciplinary action. If an individual willfully gained access to data without authorization by law, the commissioner must forward the matter to the appropriate prosecuting authority for prosecution. The commissioner must not impose disciplinary action against an individual who properly accessed data to complete an authorized transaction or to resolve an issue that did not result in a completed authorized transaction. (c) The commissioner must establish a process that allows an individual who was subject to disciplinary action to appeal the action. If the commissioner imposes disciplinary action, the commissioner must notify the individual in writing of the action, explain the reason for the action, and explain how to appeal the action. The commissioner must transmit the notification within five calendar days of the action. deleted text begin (d) The commissioner must arrange for an independent biennial audit of the driver and vehicle services information system to determine whether data currently in the system are classified correctly, how the data are used, and to verify compliance with this subdivision. The results of the audit are public. No later than 30 days following completion of the audit, the commissioner must provide a report summarizing the audit results to the commissioner of administration; the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance, public safety, and data practices; and the Legislative Commission on Data Practices and Personal Data Privacy. The report must be submitted as required under section 3.195, except that printed copies are not required. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For purposes of this subdivision, "disciplinary action" means a formal or informal disciplinary measure, including but not limited to requiring corrective action or suspending or revoking the individual's access to the driver and vehicle information system. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.12, subdivision 7b, is amended to read: Subd. 7b. Data privacy; noncompliant license or identification card. (a) With respect to noncompliant licenses or identification cards, the commissioner is prohibited from: (1) electronically disseminating outside the state data that is not disseminated as of May 19, 2017; or (2) utilizing any electronic validation or verification system accessible from or maintained outside the state that is not in use as of May 19, 2017. (b) The limitations in paragraph (a) do not apply to the extent necessary to: (1) maintain compliance with the driver's license compact under section 171.50 and applicable federal law governing commercial driver's licenses; (2) perform identity verification as part of an application for a replacement Social Security card issued by the Social Security Administration; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) perform identity verification for a program participant in the Transportation Security Administration's Registered Traveler program who has voluntarily provided their Minnesota driver's license or identification card to confirm their identity to a private entity operating under the Registered Traveler programdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) validate or verify a United States passport, certificate of citizenship, or certificate of naturalization submitted with an application for a noncompliant license or identification card. new text end (c) For purposes of paragraph (b), clause (3), the information provided for identity verification is limited to name, date of birth, the license or identification card's identification number, issuance date, expiration date, and credential security features which does not include facial recognition. (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "outside the state" includes federal agencies, states other than Minnesota, organizations operating under agreement among the states, and private entities. (e) Prior to disclosing to a data requester, other than the data subject, any data on individuals relating to a noncompliant driver's license or identification card, the commissioner or a driver's license agent must require the data requester to certify that the data requester must not use the data for civil immigration enforcement purposes or disclose the data to a state or federal government entity that primarily enforces immigration law or to any employee or agent of any such government entity. A data requester who violates the certification required in this paragraph may be liable in a civil action brought under section 13.08, may be subject to criminal penalties under section 13.09, may have subsequent requests for noncompliant driver's license or identification card data be denied by the commissioner, and may lose access to the driver records subscription service under section 168.327. A certification form used by the commissioner or a driver's license agent under this paragraph must include information about penalties that apply for violations. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026, for noncompliant license and identification card applications submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Killed in the line of duty. (a) "Killed in the line of duty" does not include new text begin any new text end deaths from natural causes, except as new text begin expressly new text end provided in this subdivision. In the case of a public safety officer, killed in the line of duty includes the death of a public safety officer caused by accidental means while the public safety officer is acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer. Killed in the line of duty also deleted text begin meansdeleted text end new text begin includesnew text end if a public safety officer dies as the direct and proximate result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture, that officer deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin is new text end presumed to have died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty if: (1) that officer, while on duty: (i) engaged in a situation, and that engagement involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical new text begin activity in new text end law enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response, emergency medical services, prison security, disaster relief, or other emergency response activity; or (ii) participated in a training exercise, and that participation involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity; (2) that officer died as a result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture suffered: (i) while engaging or participating under clause (1); (ii) while still on duty after engaging or participating under clause (1); or (iii) not later than 24 hours after engaging or participating under clause (1); and (3) the presumption is not overcome by competent medical evidence to the contrary. (b) "Killed in the line of duty" also deleted text begin meansdeleted text end new text begin includesnew text end that the officer died due to suicide: (1) secondary to a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress disorder as described in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; or (2) within 45 days of the end of exposure, while on duty, to a traumatic event. new text begin (c) "Killed in the line of duty" also includes that the officer died as a result of complications caused by exposure sustained in the line of duty to any of the following infectious diseases, viruses, or bacteria, if medical records identify the disease, virus, or bacteria as a cause of or contributing factor to the death: COVID-19; influenza; hepatitis B; hepatitis C; tuberculosis; HIV/AIDS; meningitis; MRSA; whooping cough; or streptococcus pneumoniae. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine strenuous physical activity" means line-of-duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; and new text end new text begin (3) entails an unusually high level of physical exertion. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity" means nonroutine stressful physical activity or nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful physical activity" means line-of-duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; new text end new text begin (3) entails nonnegligible physical exertion; and new text end new text begin (4) occurs: new text end new text begin (i) with respect to a situation in which a public safety officer is engaged under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) pose or appear to pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards, or reasonably foreseeable risks thereof, not faced by similarly situated members of the public in the ordinary course; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety; or new text end new text begin (ii) with respect to a training exercise in which a public safety officer participates under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) simulate in realistic fashion situations that pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public safety officer. "Public safety officer" includes: (1) a peace officer defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c) or (d); (2) a correction officer employed at a correctional facility and charged with maintaining the safety, security, discipline, and custody of inmates at the facility; (3) a corrections staff person working in a public agency and supervising offenders in the community as defined in sections 243.05, subdivision 6; 244.19, subdivision 1; and 401.01, subdivision 2; (4) an individual employed on a full-timenew text begin or part-timenew text end basis by the state or by a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state, who is engaged in any of the following duties: (i) firefighting; (ii) emergency motor vehicle operation; (iii) investigation into the cause and origin of fires; (iv) the provision of emergency medical services; or (v) hazardous material responder; (5) a legally enrolled member of a volunteernew text begin or paid on-callnew text end fire department or member of an independent nonprofit firefighting corporation who is engaged in the hazards of firefighting; (6) a good samaritan while complying with the request or direction of a public safety officer to assist the officer; (7) a reserve police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff while acting under the supervision and authority of a political subdivision; (8) a driver or attendant with a licensed basic or advanced life-support transportation service who is engaged in providing emergency care; (9) a first responder who is certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services to perform basic emergency skills before the arrival of a licensed ambulance service and who is a member of an organized service recognized by a local political subdivision to respond to medical emergencies to provide initial medical care before the arrival of an ambulance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) a person, other than a state trooper, employed by the commissioner of public safety and assigned to the State Patrol, whose primary employment duty is either Capitol security or the enforcement of commercial motor vehicle laws and regulationsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (11) a person formerly employed as a public safety officer under clauses (1) to (5) or (7) to (10) if the person separated from service due to a duty disability, as defined in section 353.01, subdivision 41. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 23. new text begin [299A.412] DETERMINING WHAT IS ROUTINE. new text end new text begin Neither of the following is dispositive in determining whether an activity or action is understood to have been performed as a matter of routine under section 299A.41: new text end new text begin (1) being generally described by the public safety agency as routine or ordinary; or new text end new text begin (2) the frequency with which the activity or action may be performed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin [299A.96] EMERGENCY CONTACT INFORMATION FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (c) "Elected official" means a state executive officer, member of the legislature, justice of the supreme court, or member of the state's federal congressional delegation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Submitting contact information to commissioner. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of subdivision 4, an elected official must submit and verify annually by January 31 to the commissioner in a commissioner-prescribed format the following information: new text end new text begin (1) primary residential address; new text end new text begin (2) any secondary address in the state; new text end new text begin (3) work telephone number; new text end new text begin (4) home telephone number; new text end new text begin (5) email address; and new text end new text begin (6) list and contact information of immediate family members. new text end new text begin (b) An elected official must notify the commissioner within 30 days after changing any information under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin All information submitted under subdivision 2 is classified as private data on individuals under section 13.02, subdivision 12. The data may be accessed by only authorized personnel for official public safety purposes when used or disclosed under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Using and disclosing information. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may use or disclose information under subdivision 2 only as follows: new text end new text begin (1) to ensure the safety and security of elected officials or their immediate family members; or new text end new text begin (2) for law enforcement purposes when needed for protecting public safety. new text end new text begin (b) Use or disclosure of the information under subdivision 2 is subject to the remedies and penalties under sections 13.08 and 13.09. new text end Sec. 25. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 17, is amended to read: Subd. 3. State Roads (a) Operations and Maintenance -0- 2,405,000 $300,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for rumble strips under Minnesota Statutes, section 161.1258. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for landscaping improvements located within trunk highway rights-of-way, with prioritization of tree planting as feasible. $1,000,000 is from the general fund for the traffic safety camera pilot program under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.147, and the evaluation and legislative report under article 3, sections 116 and 117. With the approval of the commissioner of transportation, any portion of this appropriation is available to the commissioner of public safety. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. $105,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for the cost of staff time to coordinate with the Public Utilities Commission relating to placement of high voltage transmission lines along trunk highways. (b) Program Planning and Delivery -0- 5,800,000 $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for implementation and development of statewide and regional travel demand modeling related to the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 161.178. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end . $800,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for one or more grants to metropolitan planning organizations outside the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2, for modeling activities related to the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 161.178. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is to complete environmental documentation and for preliminary engineering and design for the reconstruction of marked Trunk Highway 55 from Hennepin County State-Aid Highway 19, north of the city of Loretto to Hennepin County Road 118 near the city of Medina. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (c) State Road Construction -0- 10,900,000 $8,900,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for the acquisition, environmental analysis, predesign, design, engineering, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of trunk highway bridges, including design-build contracts, program delivery, consultant usage to support these activities, and the cost of payments to landowners for lands acquired for highway rights-of-way. Projects under this appropriation must follow eligible investment priorities identified in the Minnesota state highway investment plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.03, subdivision 1c. The commissioner may use up to 17 percent of this appropriation for program delivery. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for predesign and design of intersection safety improvements along marked Trunk Highway 65 from the interchange with marked U.S. Highway 10 to 99th Avenue Northeast in the city of Blaine. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is to design and construct trunk highway improvements associated with an interchange at U.S. Highway 169, marked Trunk Highway 282, and Scott County State-Aid Highway 9 in the city of Jordan, including accommodations for bicycles and pedestrians and for bridge and road construction. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (d) Highway Debt Service -0- 468,000 This appropriation is for transfer to the state bond fund. If this appropriation is insufficient to make all transfers required in the year for which it is made, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer the deficiency amount as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.641, and notify the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance and the chairs of the senate Finance Committee and the house of representatives Ways and Means Committee of the amount of the deficiency. Any excess appropriation cancels to the trunk highway fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 26. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 3, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Transit System Operations 1,751,000 deleted text begin 1,751,000 deleted text end new text begin -0- new text end This appropriation is for transit system operations under Minnesota Statutes, sections 473.371 to 473.449. The base is deleted text begin $20,014,000deleted text end new text begin $0new text end in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. Sec. 27. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 4, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. State Patrol (a) Patrolling Highways 147,013,000 148,960,000 Appropriations by Fund 2026 2027 General 37,000 37,000 H.U.T.D. 92,000 92,000 Trunk Highway 146,884,000 148,831,000 $1,045,000 in each year is from the trunk highway fund for recruitment and hiring initiatives. Of the base from the trunk highway fund, $10,365,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029 is for this purpose, which includes funding to conduct an additional annual trooper academy. The base from the trunk highway fund is $158,151,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. (b) Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 18,861,000 18,861,000 (c) Capitol Security deleted text begin 19,243,000 deleted text end new text begin 23,968,000 new text end deleted text begin 19,243,000 deleted text end new text begin 39,427,000 new text end This appropriation is from the general fund. new text begin $210,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,624,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for security enhancements on the Capitol complex, including but not limited to equipment, staffing, and operations. The base for this purpose is $2,709,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end new text begin $2,595,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,560,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for screening of individuals entering the State Capitol building. Of the amount in fiscal year 2027, $2,433,000 is available until June 30, 2030. The base for this purpose is $7,775,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $5,684,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $29,727,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $27,636,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end The commissioner must not: (1) spend any money from the trunk highway fund for capitol security; or (2) permanently transfer any state trooper from the patrolling highways activity to capitol security. The commissioner must not transfer any money appropriated to the commissioner under this section: (1) to capitol security; or (2) from capitol security. (d) Vehicle Crimes Unit 1,290,000 1,303,000 This appropriation is from the highway user tax distribution fund to investigate: (1) registration tax and motor vehicle sales tax liabilities from individuals and businesses that currently do not pay all taxes owed; and (2) illegal or improper activity related to the sale, transfer, titling, and registration of motor vehicles. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 28. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 4, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Driver and Vehicle Services (a) Driver Services 47,665,000 deleted text begin 47,132,000 deleted text end new text begin 48,842,000 new text end This appropriation is from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705. $317,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for rulemaking costs for the ignition interlock device program under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.306. $218,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for costs of adding work zone safety information into the driver's manual and written examination and related rulemaking. new text begin $962,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for fraud detection, prevention, and investigation to improve the integrity of drivers' licenses and identification cards. new text end new text begin $903,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for creation of electronic credentials under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.057. The base for this purpose is $584,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $549,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $48,523,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $48,488,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end (b) Vehicle Services deleted text begin 32,179,000 deleted text end new text begin 32,101,000 new text end deleted text begin 32,179,000 deleted text end new text begin 32,305,000 new text end This appropriation is from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705. $2,500,000 in each year is for payments to deputy registrars under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.33, subdivision 7a, and to driver's license agents under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.061, subdivision 4a. new text begin $106,000 in fiscal year 2027 is for administration of motor carrier audit assessment payment plans. new text end new text begin The base for this appropriation is $32,034,000 in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 29. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER DEATH BENEFIT RETROACTIVE CLAIMS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47, claims for benefits arising out of deaths occurring before July 1, 2026, that are eligible due to the retroactive changes made in this act are timely if filed before July 1, 2028. Claims for benefits arising out of deaths that occur on or after July 1, 2026, are subject to the limitation period under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47, the commissioner of public safety must: new text end new text begin (1) review previously denied benefit claims for deaths occurring between February 1, 2020, and the effective date of this act; new text end new text begin (2) determine whether the applicant is eligible for benefits based on the retroactive application of the amendments made in this act; and new text end new text begin (3) award applicable benefits according to Minnesota Statutes, sections 299A.41 to 299A.46. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 30. new text begin TRANSFERS.new text end new text begin (a) $550,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the aircraft capital account under Minnesota Statutes, section 360.024, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), to the air transportation services account under Minnesota Statutes, section 360.024, subdivision 2, paragraph (a). This is a onetime transfer. new text end new text begin (b) $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705, subdivision 1, to the driver and vehicle services technology account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705, subdivision 3. This is a onetime transfer. new text end Sec. 31. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 4, section 141, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 26-07534 Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 5, article 4, section 141 Sec. 141. new text begin DRIVER'S LICENSE SAME-DAY ISSUANCE PILOT PROJECT.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must conduct a same-day driver's license pilot project as described in this section. The pilot project must be in the cities of Lakeville and Moorhead and include any driver's license agent in either city that requests to participate in the pilot project. This section applies to driver's license agents participating in the pilot project. new text end new text begin (b) An applicant who submits a properly completed application for a noncompliant driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card must be provided with the license or card at the time of the application. The license or card must be processed and produced at the site of the application. The applicant must not be required to go to another location to receive the license or card. The applicant must not be provided with a temporary license or card. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must provide the participating driver's license agents with any necessary equipment to process and produce the driver's licenses and identification cards on site. new text end new text begin (d) By January 1, 2024, the commissioner must submit a report on the pilot project to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance. At a minimum, the report must include the following: new text end new text begin (1) a description of the pilot project and the locations that participated in the pilot project; new text end new text begin (2) how many noncompliant drivers' licenses, instruction permits, or identification cards were processed during the pilot project; new text end new text begin (3) any information or feedback from the driver's license agents about the pilot project; new text end new text begin (4) a recommendation on whether the issuance of same-day noncompliant drivers' licenses, instruction permits, or identification cards should be expanded statewide. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective on October 1, 2022, and applies to applications received on or after that date. new text end